Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201560-338
Moped, defined.

Moped means a device with fully operative pedals for propulsion by human power, an automatic transmission, and a motor with a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty cubic centimeters which produces no more than two brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the device at a maximum design speed of no more than thirty miles per hour on level ground.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 38;

Laws 2015, LB95, § 5.
August 30, 2015